Maryland, session 2025, HB0564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
19–102.
This title applies only in Dorchester County.
19–1001.
– 1 –

Ch. 820 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THERE IS A VENUE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A NONPROFIT OR FOR–PROFIT
RETAIL BUSINESS THAT HOSTS WEDDINGS, BANQUETS, PARTIES, MEETINGS, AND
SIMILAR EVENTS, WHETHER PRIVATE OR OPEN TO THE PUBLIC, AT A VENUE THAT:
(1) IS AT LEAST 2,000 SQUARE FEET IN SIZE;
(2) CAN ACCOMMODATE AT LEAST 100 INDIVIDUALS FOR A SINGLE
EVENT, WHETHER INSIDE THE VENUE OR OUTSIDE ON THE VENUE’S PREMISES; AND
(3) HAS ADEQUATE BATHROOM FACILITIES.
(C) (1) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL OR
SERVE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR AT RETAIL, BY THE DRINK OR BY THE BOTTLE, FOR
ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION:
(I) DURING AN EVENT HOSTED BY THE LICENSE HOLDER AT
THE LICENSE HOLDER’S VENUE; AND
(II) ONLY IF FOOD IS ALSO PROVIDED DURING THE EVENT.
(2) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY NOT ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL TO CARRY
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR ONTO OR OFF THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(D) THE LICENSE MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO ANOTHER LOCATION.
(E) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR DURING THE
HOURS AND DAYS AS SET OUT FOR A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
UNDER § 19–2005 OF THIS TITLE.
(F) THE ANNUAL FEE FOR THE LICENSE IS $1,500.
(G) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
19–1601.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Board may not
issue a new license for an establishment that is within 300 feet in a direct line of a place of
worship or a public or nonpublic kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school.
(2) The distance from the establishment to the place of worship or the
public or nonpublic kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school is to be measured from
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 820
the establishment in a direct line to the nearest point of the main building of the place of
worship or school.
(b) The prohibition against issuing a license in subsection (a) of this section does
not apply to the issuance of:
(1) a license for a premises that was licensed on October 1, 1996;
(2) a Class B (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license for a premises in
Cambridge, Secretary, or Hurlock; [or]
(3) a temporary license; OR
(4) A VENUE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE IF THE BOARD
RECEIVES WRITTEN CONSENT TO THE ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE FROM EACH PLACE
OF WORSHIP OR SCHOOL LOCATED WITHIN 300 FEET IN A DIRECT LINE OF THE
ESTABLISHMENT FOR WHICH THE LICENSE IS SOUGHT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –